dictsource/eo_rules
// translation rules for Esperanto
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// includes both accented characters and ascii digraph alternatives (cx, gx, ux, etc)

.replace
   cx    ĉ
   gx    ĝ
   hx    ĥ
   jx    ĵ
   sx    ŝ
   ux    ŭ


.group a
     _) a (_       a
        a          a
        aj         aI
        aŭ         aU


.group b
     _) b (_       bo
        b          b

.group c
     _) c (_       tso
     _) ch (_      tSo
        c          ts
        ch (K      tS        // foreign words
     K) ch         tS        // foreign words


.group d
     _) d (_       do
        d          d

     _) d (-ro     dokt'o
     _) d (-rino   d,okto

.group e
     _) e (_       e
        e          e
        ej         eI
        eŭ         eU

.group f
     _) f (_       fo
        f          f

     _) f (-ino    fR%aUl
     _) f (-lo     fRaU

.group g
     _) g (_       go
        g          g
        gh (K      dZ

.group h
     _) h (_       ho
        h          h
        hh         x


.group i
     _) i (_       i
        i          i


.group j
     _) j (_       jo
        j          j
        jh (C      Z

.group k
     _) k (_       ko
        k          k

     _) k (-do     kamaR'a
     _) k (-dino   k'amaRa
     _) k (-ino    k'amaRad


.group l
     _) l (_       lo
        l          l
        ll (_      l


.group m
     _) m (_       mo
        m          m

.group n
     _) n (_       no
        n          n
        n (_S1     n

     _) n (-ro     num'e


.group o
     _) o (_       o
        o          o
        oj         oI
     -) o (_       %o
     -) oj (_      %oI
     -) on (_      %on
    -X) o (_       %o        // d-ro  etc
    -X) oj (_      %oI
    -X) on (_      %on

.group p
     _) p (_       po
        p          p
        ph (K      f         // foreign words
     K) ph         f         // foreign words

.group q
     _) q (_       kwo
        q          k
        qu         kv

.group r
     _) r (_       Ro
        r          R
     A) r (A       R
     K) r (A       @-*
        rr         RR

.group s
     _) s (_       so
     _) sh (_      So
        s          s
        sh (K      S         // foreign words
     K) sh         S         // foreign words

     _) s (-ino    s,injoR
     _) s (-ro     sinj'o

     _) s (-ano    s'am,ide
     _) s (-anino  s'am,ide

     _) s (-ta_    s'ank


.group t
     _) t (_       to
        t          t
        th (K      T         // foreign words
     K) th         T         // foreign words

     -) ta (_      t%a       // s-ta = sankta

.group u
     _) u (_       u
        u          u
        uj         uI


.group v
     _) v (_       vo
        v          v

.group w
     _) w (_       du'oblav,o
        w          w
     K) wh         w         // foreign words

.group x
     _) x (_       ikso
        x          ks
     _) x          z         // foreign words

.group y
     _) y (_       ipsilono
        y          j
     K) y (K       i


.group z
     _) z (_       zo
        z          z


.group
     _) ĉ (_       tSo
        ĉ          tS

     _) ĝ (_       dZo
        ĝ          dZ

     _) ĥ (_       xo
        ĥ          x

     _) ĵ (_       Zo
        ĵ          Z

     _) ŝ (_       So
        ŝ          S

     _) ŭ (_       wo
        ŭ          w

     C) ' (_       =         // word end in apostrophe, stress the last vowel

' 
        +          plus_
     _) ++ (_      plusplus

        .          punkto
        . (.       _:
    \.) . 


        £          pundo
        £ (_D      _pundoI_:
    __) - (_D      minus_
    D_) - (_D      st@-*ek'eto_
    A_) - (_D      _
    C_) - (_D      _
    --) - 
        -          minus_
        - (_a 
        $          dolaRo
        $ (_D      _dolaRoI_:
